Illinois, session 104th, HB2466.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act, and except to the 8extent that any of the following words or phrases is 9specifically qualified by its context:10    "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 11Commission created by this Act.12    "Enrollment" means the establishment and maintenance of an 13individual's status as a student in an institution of higher 14learning, regardless of the terms used at the institution to 15describe that status.16    "Approved high school" means any public high school 17located in this State; and any high school, located in this 18State or elsewhere (whether designated as a high school, 19secondary school, academy, preparatory school, or otherwise) 20which in the judgment of the State Superintendent of Education 21provides a course of instruction at the secondary level and 22maintains standards of instruction substantially equivalent to 23those of the public high schools located in this State.  HB2466 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10383 LNS 20458 b1    "Institution of higher learning", "qualified institution", 2or "institution" means an educational organization located in 3this State which4        (1) provides at least an organized 2 year program of 5    collegiate grade in the liberal arts or sciences, or both, 6    directly applicable toward the attainment of a 7    baccalaureate degree or a program in health education 8    directly applicable toward the attainment of a 9    certificate, diploma, or an associate degree;10        (2) either is11            (A) operated by this State, or12            (B) operated publicly or privately, not for 13        profit, or14            (C) operated for profit, provided such for profit 15        organization16                (i) offers degree programs which have been 17            approved by the Board of Higher Education for a 18            minimum of 3 years under the Academic Degree Act, 19            and20                (ii) enrolls a majority of its students in 21            such degree programs, and22                (iii) maintains an accredited status with the 23            Commission on Institutions of Higher Education of 24            the North Central Association of Colleges and 25            Schools;26        (3) in the judgment of the Commission meets standards   HB2466 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10383 LNS 20458 b1    substantially equivalent to those of comparable 2    institutions operated by this State; and3        (4) if so required by the Commission, uses the State 4    as its primary guarantor of student loans made under the 5    federal Higher Education Act of 1965.6For otherwise eligible educational organizations which provide 7academic programs for incarcerated students, the terms 8"institution of higher learning", "qualified institutions", 9and "institution" shall specifically exclude academic programs 10for incarcerated students except for students participating in 11the monetary award program established under Section 35 of 12this Act.13    "Academic year" means a 12 month period of time, normally 14but not exclusively, from September 1 of any year through 15August 31 of the ensuing year.16    "Full-time student" means any undergraduate student 17enrolled in 12 or more semester or quarter hours of credit 18courses in any given semester or quarter or in the equivalent 19number of units of registration as determined by the 20Commission.21    "Part-time student" means any undergraduate student, other 22than a full-time student, enrolled in 6 or more semester or 23quarter hours of credit courses in any given semester or 24quarter or in the equivalent number of units of registration 25as determined by the Commission. Beginning with fiscal year 261999, the Commission may, on a program by program basis,   HB2466 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10383 LNS 20458 b1expand this definition of "part-time student" to include 2students who enroll in less than 6 semester or quarter hours of 3credit courses in any given semester or quarter.4    "Public university" means any public 4-year university in 5this State. 6    "Public university campus" means any campus under the 7governance or supervision of a public university. 8(Source: P.A. 100-587, eff. 6-4-18; 100-1015, eff. 8-21-18.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.